Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.530.020

Bond issuance—Election—Resolution to specify purposes.

(1) The question whether the bonds shall be issued, as provided in RCW 28A.530.010, shall be determined at an election to be held pursuant to RCW 39.36.050. If a majority of the votes cast at such election favor the issuance of such bonds, the board of directors must issue such bonds: PROVIDED, That if the amount of bonds to be issued, together with any outstanding indebtedness of the district that only needs a simple majority voter approval, exceeds three-eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in said district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, then three-fifths of the votes cast at such election must be in favor of the issuance of such bonds, before the board of directors is authorized to issue said bonds.

(2) The resolution adopted by the board of directors calling the election in subsection (1) of this section shall specify the purposes of the debt financing measure, including the specific buildings to be constructed or remodeled and any additional specific purposes as authorized by RCW 28A.530.010. If the debt financing measure anticipates the receipt of state financing assistance under chapter 28A.525 RCW, the board resolution also shall describe the specific anticipated purpose of the state assistance. If the school board subsequently determines that state or local circumstances should cause any alteration to the specific expenditures from the debt financing or of the state assistance, the board shall first conduct a public hearing to consider those circumstances and to receive public testimony. If the board then determines that any such alterations are in the best interests of the district, it may adopt a new resolution or amend the original resolution at a public meeting held subsequent to the meeting at which public testimony was received.

[ 1996 c 48 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 478; 1984 c 186 s 11; 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 9; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.51.020. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 324 s 2; RRS s 4942; prior: 1897 c 118 s 118; 1890 p 46 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.51.020, 28.51.020, 28.51.050, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Severability—Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 39.36.015.